Tennessee, session 114, SB0773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-3-413(d), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(4) A vesting period established pursuant to subsection (c) or this subsection (d)
does not expire because of pending litigation challenging a permit, and the vesting
period is tolled while such litigation is pending.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-4-310(d), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(4) A vesting period established pursuant to subsection (c) or this subsection (d)
does not expire because of pending litigation challenging a permit, and the vesting
period is tolled while such litigation is pending.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect on July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0773
002730
- 1 -